Wisconsin, session 2025, AB726.
do enact as follows:AB726,11Section 1. 301.30 of the statutes is amended to read:AB726,2,82301.30 Inmate wages, allowances, and release payments. The 3department may pay a wage or an allowance and a release payment to inmates at 4its institutions. The department shall prescribe the amounts of pay and such 5hours, health, and other conditions in connection with employment as are 6reasonable, but all inmates that perform labor shall be paid a wage, and the wage 7paid under this section may not be set at a rate that is less than the hourly rate 8established under s. 104.035 (3) (a) 1.AB726,29Section 2. 303.01 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB726,2,1710303.01 (4) Wage standards. All inmates and residents that perform labor 11shall be paid a wage that is. The wage that inmates and residents are paid shall be 12based on the productivity of the work the inmates and residents perform. Wages 13may be established at an hourly rate plus an incentive wage based on productivity 14and piecework formulas may be created. However, wages shall, but wages may not 15be set at a rate such as to cause a deficit on operations that is less than the hourly 16rate established under s. 104.035 (3) (a) 1. Changes in inmate and resident wage 17rate schedules may not be made without approval of the prison industries board.AB726,31Section 3. 303.08 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB726,3,132303.08 (3) The sheriff shall endeavor to secure employment or employment 3training for unemployed prisoners under this section. An employer that employs a 4prisoner for work under this section shall pay the prisoner at a rate not less than 5the hourly rate established under s. 104.035 (3) (a) 1. If a prisoner is employed for 6wages or salary or receives unemployment insurance or employment training 7benefits while in custody in the jail, the sheriff shall collect the wages or salary or 8require the prisoner to turn over the wages, salary, or benefits in full when received. 9The sheriff shall deposit the wages, salary, or benefits in a trust checking account 10and shall keep a ledger showing the status of the account of each prisoner. Such 11wages or salary are not subject to garnishment in the hands of either the employer 12or the sheriff during the prisoner’s term, and shall be disbursed only as provided in 13this section; but for tax purposes they are income of the prisoner.AB726,414Section 4. 303.10 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB726,3,1715303.10 (10) An employer that employs a prisoner for work under this section 16shall pay the prisoner at a rate set by the county board by ordinance, except that 17such rate may not be less than the hourly rate established under s. 104.035 (3) (a) 1.AB726,518Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.AB726,3,2119(1) Notwithstanding s. 303.01 (4), the inmate and resident wage rates 20established under s. 303.01 (4), as affected by this act, shall be increased by $2.33 21per hour on the effective date of this subsection.AB726,622Section 6. Fiscal changes.AB726,4,623(1) Wages of inmates of state correctional institutions. In the schedule 1under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of corrections under s. 220.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $58,933,600 3to pay the wages of inmates in state correctional institutions. In the schedule under 4s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of corrections under s. 20.410 5(1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $88,400,400 to pay 6the wages of inmates in state correctional institutions.AB726,4,147(2) Wages of inmates under the bureau of correctional enterprises. 8In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of 9corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 10increased by $873,300 to pay the wages of inmates engaged in labor under the 11bureau of correctional enterprises. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 12appropriation to the department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar 13amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,310,000 to pay the wages of 14inmates engaged in labor under the bureau of correctional enterprises.AB726,4,1515